Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,171
Excessive pressure prohibited.

The owner, user, or person or persons in charge of any boiler required to be inspected by the Boiler Inspection Act shall not allow or permit a greater pressure in any unit than is stated in the certificate of inspection issued by the inspector.

Laws 1943, c. 112, § 2(4), p. 393;

R.S.1943, § 48-705;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 48-705;

Laws 1987, LB 462, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 438, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-725;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 7.